North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116. Higher Education.
Article 1. The University of North Carolina.

Part 1. General Provisions.

§ 116-1.
Purpose.

In order to foster the development of a well-planned and coordinated system of higher education, to improve the quality of education, to extend its benefits and to encourage an economical use of the State’s resources, the University of North Carolina is hereby redefined in accordance with the provisions of this Article.

The University of North Carolina is a public, multicampus university dedicated to the service of North Carolina and its people. It encompasses the 16 diverse constituent institutions and other educational, research, and public service organizations. Each shares in the overall mission of the university. That mission is to discover, create, transmit, and apply knowledge to address the needs of individuals and society. This mission is accomplished through instruction, which communicates the knowledge and values and imparts the skills necessary for individuals to lead responsible, productive, and personally satisfying lives; through research, scholarship, and creative activities, which advance knowledge and enhance the educational process; and through public service, which contributes to the solution of societal problems and enriches the quality of life in the State. In the fulfillment of this mission, the university shall seek an efficient use of available resources to ensure the highest quality in its service to the citizens of the State.Teaching and learning constitute the primary service that the university renders to society. Teaching, or instruction, is the primary responsibility of each of the constituent institutions. The relative importance of research and public service, which enhance teaching and learning, varies among the constituent institutions, depending on their overall missions.

History.

1971, c. 1244, s. 1; 1995, c. 507, s. 15.17.

Cross References.

As to information and financial assistance for nursing students and inactive nurses, see Article 9B of Chapter 90,

G.S. 90-171.50

et seq.

As to UNC admissions policy for early college graduates, see

G.S. 116-11.3

.

As to collaboration on research to address the behavioral health problems and challenges facing military personnel, veterans, and their families, see

G.S. 127B-20

.

William Friday Institute for Higher Education Leadership.

Session Laws 2004-124, s. 6.28(a)-(c), provides: “(1)
There is a serious and continuing need for systematic education and training and education within The University of North Carolina to prepare men and women to perform effectively in progressively responsible positions of administrative leadership in colleges and universities in North Carolina and the nation.

“(2) The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina (UNC) and the staff in the Office of the President are in agreement that The University of North Carolina must provide a mechanism by which talented faculty and staff within the UNC system can move into administrative positions.

“(3) A significant component of increasing the strength of The University of North Carolina is increasing the administrative acumen of its faculty, department chairs, deans, and other administrators to prepare them for leadership positions.

“(4) Historically, academic administrators moved into their positions directly from the faculty, but the complexities of leadership make such changes nearly impossible today.

“(5)
Business and industry focus on succession planning, climate surveys, and leadership development, but universities have been slower to respond to the need to develop talent within the organization.

“(6)
Some universities have developed leadership programs, and the best of these programs nationally are those that are responsive to the culture of the institution or system.

“(7)
Establishing an institute for higher education leadership development will help change the current pattern within the UNC system by providing ongoing professional development for faculty and administrators on UNC campuses.

“(8)
Faculty and administrators will have opportunities to learn ‘best practices’ from their colleagues as well as from national experts in key areas, and models will be provided that can be transferred back to the campuses.

“(9)
Administrative internships on campuses and at the Office of the President will provide aspiring administrators opportunities to experience new environments and to learn leadership skills through observation and participation.

“(10) It is critical that The University of North Carolina provide opportunities for faculty within the system to advance professionally without having to leave North Carolina.

“The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina shall establish the William Friday Institute for Higher Education Leadership (the ‘Institute’). The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina shall also establish an advisory board for the Institute.

“The purpose of the Institute is to enable students, faculty, and administrators on the campuses of The University of North Carolina to explore and validate their interest in and fitness for careers in academic administration and to gain skills, insight, information, contacts, and experience through ongoing professional leadership development programs.”

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 11.7(a)-(h), as amended by Session Laws 2016-94, s. 11.2(a)-(d), provides: “(a) The General Assembly finds that the six-year graduation rate for students pursuing a baccalaureate degree from any constituent institution of The University of North Carolina is too low. The General Assembly further finds that it is important to design and implement a program for the purpose of achieving the following goals: to assist more students to obtain a baccalaureate degree within a shorter time period; to provide students with a college education at significantly lower costs for both the student and the State; to help decrease the amount of debt resulting from loans that a student may owe upon graduation; to provide a student with an interim degree that may increase a student’s job opportunities if the student chooses not to continue postsecondary education; and to provide easier access to academic counseling that will assist a student in selecting coursework that reflects the student’s educational and career goals and helps the student succeed academically.

“(b) The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina and the State Board of Community Colleges shall jointly study and evaluate how a deferred admission program, to be known as the North Carolina Guaranteed Admission Program (NCGAP), for students identified as academically at risk and designed pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, would address the issues and help achieve the goals set out in subsection (a) of this section. In its study the Board of Governors and State Board of Community Colleges shall also consider the best procedure for implementing NCGAP and the fiscal impact it may have with respect to enrollment.

“By January 1, 2017, the President of The University of North Carolina, in consultation with the Board of Governors, shall adopt a plan to improve student completion of baccalaureate degrees that includes specific targets for each constituent institution’s completion rates and that is effective for the 2017-2018 academic year. For the purposes of this section, “completion rates” may include the four and six year graduation rate of first-time, full-time freshman or other methods of measuring completion that may more accurately capture the success of each institution’s undergraduate population. The plan shall allow for a variety of strategies designed to best meet the individual constituent institutions’ needs, such as, but not limited to: redesigned courses, early alerts systems, tutoring, degree mapping, and innovative merit-based completion incentives.

“(c) NCGAP shall be a deferred admission program that requires a student who satisfies the admission criteria of a constituent institution, but whose academic credentials are not as competitive as other students admitted to the institution, to enroll in a community college in this State and earn an associate degree prior to enrolling as a student at the constituent institution. A student who earns an associate degree from a community college in this State within three years from the date of the deferred acceptance is guaranteed admission at that constituent institution to complete the requirements for a baccalaureate degree. A constituent institution shall hold in reserve an enrollment slot in the appropriate future academic year for any student who accepts a deferred admission. A constituent institution shall also reduce its enrollment for each academic year by the number of deferred admissions granted for that academic year.

“(d) The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina and the State Board of Community Colleges shall report their finding and recommendations to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee, the Fiscal Research Division, and the Office of State Budget and Management by March 1, 2016. The report shall include an analysis of the fiscal impact NCGAP may have with regard to enrollment at constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina and at community colleges, the number of students who may participate in NCGAP, and its effect on FTEs.

“The President of the University of North Carolina shall report on the plan to improve student completions to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee, the Fiscal Research Division, and the Office of State Budget and Management by January 1, 2017.

“(e) Based on the analysis conducted by the Board of Governors and the State Board of Community Colleges pursuant to subsection (b) of this section and the recommendations made pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, each constituent institution shall design a deferred admission program as part of NCGAP for implementation at the institution. The institution shall design the program so that it may be implemented at the institution beginning with the 2017-2018 fiscal year and applied to the institution’s admission process for the 2018-2019 academic year and each subsequent academic year if the plan required by subsection (b) of this section is not implemented.

“(f) The State Board of Community Colleges, in consultation with the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina, shall adopt rules to ensure that a student participating in NCGAP is provided counseling and assistance in selecting coursework that reflects the student’s educational and career goals and that provides a smooth transition from the community college to the constituent institution if the plan required by subsection (b) of this section is not implemented.

“(g) NCGAP shall be implemented at all constituent institutions and all community colleges beginning with the 2017-2018 fiscal year and shall apply to admissions policies at each constituent institution and community college beginning with the 2018-2019 academic year and each subsequent academic year if the plan required by subsection (b) of this section is not implemented.

“(h) This section does not apply to the North Carolina School of Science and Mathematics.”

Session Laws 2016-94, s. 1.2, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2016.’ ”

Session Laws 2016-94, s. 39.4, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2016-2017 fiscal year, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2016-2017 fiscal year.”

Session Laws 2016-94, s. 39.7, is a severability clause.

Session Laws 2017-68, s. 1(a), provides: “The President of The University of North Carolina shall implement the University of North Carolina Undergraduate Degree Completion Improvement Plan, developed in accordance with Section 11.7 of S.L. 2015-241, as amended by Section 11.2 of S.L. 2016-94, and presented to the General Assembly on December 31, 2016, effective beginning with the 2017-2018 academic year.”

Session Laws 2017-68, s. 3(a)-(c), provides: “(a) The President, or the President’s designee, and the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina shall jointly consider and evaluate the feasibility of applying for and implementing the UTEACH program as part of the curricula offered by the University of North Carolina System.

“UTEACH is a model program originally developed by the University of Texas at Austin. It is designed as a secondary STEM (science, technology, engineering, and mathematics) teacher preparation program with the goal of attracting high-caliber students, experienced and successful master teachers, and tenure-track faculty who are interested in STEM education. The UTEACH program is a course of study that combines the requirements for rigorous STEM degrees and for secondary teaching certification without adding time or cost to four-year degrees.

“(b) In their evaluation of the UTEACH program, the President, or the President’s designee, and the Board of Governors may consider the following:

“(1)
How the UTEACH program would match up with the curricula currently offered through the University of North Carolina System and what adjustments, if any, would be required for implementation of the UTEACH program.

“(2)
Which constituent institutions and which departments and programs at those institutions would participate and collaborate in the UTEACH program if it was implemented.

“(3)
The application process and time frame required to develop a UTEACH program tailored to fit within the curricula of the University of North Carolina System.

“(4)
The cost of implementing and maintaining a UTEACH program and the alternatives for financing the program.

“(5)
Any statutory amendments or other legislative action that would be needed for the implementation of a UTEACH program.

“(c) The President, or the President’s designee, and the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina shall report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee by April 1, 2018, their findings and recommendations regarding the feasibility of applying for and implementing the UTEACH program as part of the curricula offered through the University of North Carolina System.”

“(6)
Any other issues the President, or the President’s designee, and the Board of Governors deem relevant in their evaluation of the UTEACH program.

§ 116-2.
Definitions.

As used in this Article, unless the context clearly indicates a contrary intent:

“Board” means the Board of Governors of the University of North Carolina.

“Board of trustees” means the board of trustees of a constituent institution.

“Chancellor” means the chancellor of a constituent institution.

“Constituent institution” or “institution” means one of the 16 public institutions of higher education, to wit, the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill, North Carolina State University at Raleigh, the University of North Carolina at Greensboro, the University of North Carolina at Charlotte, the University of North Carolina at Asheville, the University of North Carolina at Wilmington, Appalachian State University, East Carolina University, Elizabeth City State University, Fayetteville State University, North Carolina Agricultural and Technical State University, North Carolina Central University, North Carolina School of the Arts, redesignated effective August 1, 2008, as the “University of North Carolina School of the Arts,” Pembroke State University, redesignated effective July 1, 1996, as the “University of North Carolina at Pembroke”, Western Carolina University, and Winston-Salem State University, and the constituent high school, the North Carolina School of Science and Mathematics.

“President” means the President of the University of North Carolina.

“Vending facilities” has the same meaning as it does in

G.S. 111-42(d)

, but also means any mechanical or electronic device dispensing items or something of value or entertainment or services for a fee, regardless of the method of activation, and regardless of the means of payment, whether by coin, currency, tokens, or other means.

History.

1971, c. 1244, s. 1; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 171; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 603, s. 1; 2006-66, s. 9.11(a); 2006-203, s. 39; 2008-192, s. 1.

§ 116-2.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 1244, s. 1.

Part 2. Organization, Governance and Property of the University.

§ 116-3.
Incorporation and corporate powers.

The Board of Trustees of the University of North Carolina is hereby redesignated, effective July 1, 1972, as the “Board of Governors of the University of North Carolina.” The Board of Governors of the University of North Carolina shall be known and distinguished by the name of “the University of North Carolina” and shall continue as a body politic and corporate and by that name shall have perpetual succession and a common seal. It shall be able and capable in law to take, demand, receive, and possess all moneys, goods, and chattels that shall be given for the use of the University, and to apply to same according to the will of the donors; and by gift, purchase, or devise to receive, possess, enjoy, and retain forever any and all real and personal estate and funds, of whatsoever kind, nature, or quality the same may be, in special trust and confidence that the same, or the profits thereof, shall be applied to and for the use and purpose of establishing and endowing the University, and shall have power to receive donations from any source whatever, to be exclusively devoted to the purposes of the maintenance of the University, or according to the terms of donation.

The corporation shall be able and capable in law to bargain, sell, grant, alien, or dispose of and convey and assure to the purchasers any and all such real and personal estate and funds as it may lawfully acquire when the condition of the grant to it or the will of the devisor does not forbid it; and shall be able and capable in law to sue and be sued in all courts whatsoever; and shall have power to open and receive subscriptions, and in general may do all such things as are usually done by bodies corporate and politic, or such as may be necessary for the promotion of learning and virtue.

History.

1971, c. 1244, s. 1.

§ 116-3.3.
Mediation matters.

Evidence of statements made and conduct occurring in a mediation of a personnel matter involving The University of North Carolina or a constituent institution shall not be subject to discovery and shall be inadmissible in any proceeding in any action on the same claim or any other claim, administrative or judicial, except in a proceeding to enforce a signed settlement agreement. Such evidence is not a public record under Chapter 132 of the General Statutes. Any evidence discoverable or admissible prior to the mediation shall remain discoverable and admissible, whether or not it is presented or discussed during mediation.

No mediator, person training to become a mediator, nor participant in a mediation of a personnel matter involving The University of North Carolina or a constituent institution shall be compelled to testify or produce evidence with respect to the mediation of the personnel matter in any civil proceeding, except to attest to the signing of any such agreement.

History.

2004-154, s. 1.

§ 116-4.
Constituent institutions of the University of North Carolina.

The University of North Carolina shall be composed of the following institutions of higher education: the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill, North Carolina State University at Raleigh, the University of North Carolina at Greensboro, the University of North Carolina at Charlotte, the University of North Carolina at Asheville, the University of North Carolina at Wilmington, Appalachian State University, East Carolina University, Elizabeth City State University, Fayetteville State University, North Carolina Agricultural and Technical State University, North Carolina Central University, North Carolina School of the Arts, redesignated effective August 1, 2008, as the “University of North Carolina School of the Arts,” Pembroke State University, redesignated effective July 1, 1996, as the “University of North Carolina at Pembroke”, Western Carolina University and Winston-Salem State University, and the constituent high school, the North Carolina School of Science and Mathematics.

History.

1971, c. 1244, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 603, s. 2; 2006-66, s. 9.11(b); 2008-192, s. 2.

§ 116-4.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 1244, s. 1.

§ 116-5.
Initial membership of Board of Governors.

Commencing July 1, 1972, and continuing for the terms hereinafter stated and until their successors are chosen, the Board of Governors shall consist of the following members:

Three persons elected prior to January 1, 1972, by and from the membership of the Board of Trustees of East Carolina University and two persons elected prior to January 1, 1972, by and from the membership of the board of trustees of each of the following institutions: Appalachian State University, North Carolina Agricultural and Technical State University, North Carolina Central University, and Western Carolina University.

One person elected prior to January 1, 1972, by and from the membership of the board of trustees of each of the following institutions: Elizabeth City State University, Fayetteville State University, North Carolina School of the Arts, redesignated effective August 1, 2008, as the “University of North Carolina School of the Arts,” Pembroke State University, redesignated effective July 1, 1996, as the “University of North Carolina at Pembroke”, and Winston-Salem State University.

Sixteen persons elected prior to January 1, 1972, by and from the membership of the Board of Trustees of the University of North Carolina.

Two persons elected prior to January 1, 1972, by the Board of Higher Education from its eight members-at-large. These shall be nonvoting members whose terms shall expire on June 30, 1973.

Of the 16 persons elected by the Board of Trustees of the University of North Carolina, four shall serve a term ending on June 30, 1973, four shall serve a term ending on June 30, 1975, four shall serve a term ending on June 30, 1977, and four shall serve a term ending on June 30, 1979. On January 1, 1972, or as soon as practicable thereafter, those 16 persons shall by lot or other means acceptable to them determine which of them shall be assigned the terms ending in 1973, 1975, 1977, and 1979 respectively. Of the 11 persons elected by the boards of trustees of the institutions listed in G.S. 116-5(a)(1), three shall serve a term ending in 1973, three shall serve a term ending on June 30, 1975, three shall serve a term ending on June 30, 1977, and two shall serve a term ending on June 30, 1979. On January 1, 1972, or as soon as practicable thereafter, those 11 persons shall by lot or other means acceptable to them determine which of them shall be assigned the terms ending in 1973, 1975, 1977, and 1979 respectively. Of the five persons elected by the boards of trustees of the institutions listed in G.S. 116-5(a)(2), the member elected from the Board of Trustees of the University of North Carolina School of the Arts shall serve a term ending on June 30, 1973, and of the remaining members, one shall serve a term ending on June 30, 1975, one shall serve a term ending on June 30, 1977, and two shall serve a term ending on June 30, 1979. On January 1, 1972, or as soon as practicable thereafter, those four persons, excluding the member from the University of North Carolina School of the Arts, shall by lot or other means acceptable to them determine which of them shall be assigned the terms ending in 1975, 1977, and 1979 respectively.

Any vacancy occurring in the membership of the Board of Governors between July 1, 1972, and June 30, 1973, shall be filled by appointment of the Governor, and the person appointed shall serve for the remainder of the unexpired term.

The Governor shall serve ex officio as a member and as chairman of the Board of Governors until December 31, 1972.

History.

1971, c. 1244, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 603, s. 3; 2008-192, ss. 3, 12.

§ 116-6.
Election and terms of members of Board of Governors.

As the terms of members of the Board of Governors provided for in

G.S. 116-5

expire, their successors shall be elected by the Senate and House of Representatives. Twelve members shall be elected at the regular legislative session in 2017 and every two years thereafter. The Senate and the House of Representatives shall each elect one-half of the persons necessary to fill the vacancies on the Board of Governors.

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-503, s. 1, effective December 19, 2001.

In electing members to the Board of Governors, the Senate and the House of Representatives shall select from a slate of candidates made in each house. The slate shall be prepared as provided by resolution of each house. If a sufficient number of nominees who are legally qualified are submitted, then the slate of candidates shall list at least twice the number of candidates for the total seats open. All qualified candidates shall compete against all other qualified candidates. In 1993 and biennially thereafter, each house shall hold their elections within 30 legislative days after appointments to their education committees are complete.

All terms shall commence on July 1 of odd-numbered years and all members shall serve for four-year overlapping terms.

Beginning with elections held on or after January 1, 2017, no person may be elected to more than three full four-year terms. Election for a partial term to fill a vacancy as provided in

G.S. 116-7

shall not count toward the three-term limitation.

Any person who has served at least one full term as chairman of the Board of Governors shall be a member emeritus of the Board of Governors for one four-year term beginning at the expiration of that member’s regular elected term. Any person already serving as an emeritus member may serve an additional four-year term beginning July 1, 1991. Members emeriti have all the rights and privileges of membership except they do not have a vote.

Effective July 1, 1991, and thereafter, any person who has served at least one term as a member of the Board of Governors after having served as Governor of North Carolina shall be a member emeritus of the Board of Governors, with all the rights and privileges of membership as in G.S. 116-6(f).

History.

1971, c. 1244, s. 1; 1987, c. 228; 1989, c. 274; 1991, c. 220, ss. 2, 3; c. 436, s. 1; 2001-503, s. 1; 2015-300, s. 1; 2017-1, s. 1.

§ 116-6.1.
Student member of the Board of Governors.

Commencing July 1, 1991, and during a person’s continuance as a student in good standing at a constituent institution of The University of North Carolina, the person serving as president of the University of North Carolina Association of Student Governments (UNCASG) or the person’s designee shall serve ex officio as a member of the Board of Governors. This student member shall be in addition to the 24 members elected to the Board of Governors.

The student member shall have all the rights and privileges of membership, except that the student member shall not have a vote.

History.

1991, c. 220, s. 1; 2017-1, ss. 2, 3; 2017-6, s. 3.

§ 116-7.
General provisions concerning members of the Board of Governors.

All members of the Board of Governors shall be selected for their interest in, and their ability to contribute to the fulfillment of, the purposes of the Board of Governors, and all members shall be deemed members-at-large, charged with the responsibility of serving the best interests of the whole State. In electing members, the objective shall be to obtain the services of the citizens of the State who are qualified by training and experience to administer the affairs of The University of North Carolina. Members shall be selected based upon their ability to further the educational mission of The University through their knowledge and understanding of the educational needs and desires of all the State’s citizens, and their economic, geographic, political, racial, gender, and ethnic diversity.

No member of the General Assembly or officer or employee of the State, The University of North Carolina, or any constituent institution may be a member of the Board of Governors. No spouse of a member of the General Assembly, or of an officer or employee of The University of North Carolina, or of any constituent institution may be a member of the Board of Governors. Any member of the Board of Governors who is elected or appointed to the General Assembly or who becomes an officer or employee of the State or of any constituent institution or whose spouse is elected or appointed to the General Assembly or becomes an officer or employee of The University of North Carolina or of any constituent institution shall be deemed thereupon to resign from his membership on the Board of Governors.

(b1)

Upon receipt of a referral from the State Ethics Commission in accordance with G.S. 138A-12(m) concerning a member of the Board of Governors, the principal clerk of the house of the General Assembly receiving the referral shall immediately refer the matter to the appropriate education committee of that house. That committee may recommend to that house a resolution providing for the removal of the Board member. If the committee’s proposed resolution is adopted by a majority of the members present and voting of that house, the public servant shall be removed and the seat previously held by that Board member becomes vacant.

Whenever any vacancy shall occur in the elected membership of the Board of Governors, it shall be the duty of the Board to inform the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President of the Senate of the vacancy. The chamber that originally elected the vacating member shall elect a person to fill the vacancy. The vacancy shall remain unfilled until the appropriate chamber of the General Assembly elects a person to fill the vacancy.The vacancy shall be filled not later than the adjournment sine die of the next regular session of the General Assembly. The election shall be for the remainder of the unexpired term. Whenever a member shall fail, for any reason other than ill health or service in the interest of the State or nation, to be present for four successive regular meetings of the Board, his place as a member shall be deemed vacant.

History.

1971, c. 1244, s. 1; 1977, c. 875; 1982, Ex. Sess., c. 1, s. 1; 1991, c. 436, s. 2; 2001-503, s. 2; 2006-201, s. 2(b); 2007-278, s. 1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make technical and conforming changes to catchlines, internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes. Pursuant to this authority, in subsection (b1), the Revisor substituted “Bipartisan State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement” for “State Ethics Commission” and substituted “G.S. 163A-156(m)” for “G.S. 138A-12(k).”

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), and 6.1, repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the changes to references in subsection (b1).

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 11.12(a)-(d), as amended by Session Laws 2016-94, s. 11.1, provides: “(a) The internship program created pursuant to S.L. 2014-100 to provide internships and career-based opportunities for students attending Historically Black Colleges and Universities may be offered to four or more HBCUs in the discretion of the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina. Further, there is no requirement that Elizabeth City State University be a permanent participant in the internship program. The internship program shall be administered as provided by subsection (b) of this section.

“(b) For the 2016-2017 fiscal year, the Board of Governors shall conduct a competitive process to select institutions of higher education that are Historically Black Colleges and Universities to participate in the internship program which links a minimum of 95 students attending Historically Black Colleges and Universities with North Carolina-based companies. The Board of Governors shall determine the number of institutions that may participate in the program; however, at least two of the institutions shall be private institutions. Funds appropriated by this act for this internship program shall be allocated only to constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina that are designated as an HBCU and private colleges and universities located in North Carolina that are designated as an HBCU.

“(c) Of the funds appropriated by this act for the support of the internship program, The University of North Carolina may use up to five percent (5%) for costs associated with administering this program.

“(d) This section applies to the 2015-2016 fiscal year and each subsequent fiscal year.”

§ 116-8.
Chairman, vice-chairman and secretary.

The Board of Governors shall elect from its membership for two-year terms, and until their successors have been elected and qualified, a chairman, a vice-chairman and a secretary. No person may serve as chairman more than four years in succession.

History.

1971, c. 1244, s. 1.

§ 116-9.
Meetings of Board of Governors.

The Board of Governors shall meet at stated times established by the Board, but not less frequently than six times a year. The Board of Governors shall also meet with the State Board of Education and the State Board of Community Colleges at least once a year to discuss educational matters of mutual interest and to recommend to the General Assembly such policies as are appropriate to encourage the improvement of public education at every level in this State; these joint meetings shall be hosted by the three Boards according to the schedule set out in G.S. 115C-11(b1). A quorum for the conduct of business shall consist of a majority of the members.

History.

1971, c. 1244, s. 1; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1102, s. 3.

§ 116-10.
Committees.

The Board of Governors shall have power to appoint from its own number committees which shall be clothed with such powers as the Board of Governors may confer. No committee may reverse a decision concerning policy taken by the Board of Governors at a regular meeting.

History.

1971, c. 1244, s. 1.